Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1808
Livestock lanes; when provided by county board.

Whenever the condition of any sand roadbed shall be such that the driving of cattle or other livestock thereon will destroy or impair said sand roadbed, the county board may at its discretion, locate, build, and maintain lanes or other driveways adjacent to said road through which such cattle or other livestock shall be driven.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. V, § 8, p. 554.